Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3325.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin (a) $200,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $200,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to HealthcareMN to support programs that improve healthcare innovation, entrepreneurship, economic growth, and community impact. These are onetime appropriations. new text end new text begin (b) Grant proceeds must be used to: new text end new text begin (1) host a healthcare venture summit to connect entrepreneurs, investors, and industry leaders and foster collaboration and investment in healthcare innovation; new text end new text begin (2) expand regional outreach to position the Twin Cities metropolitan area as a leading hub for healthcare innovation and enhance resources and partnerships across the ecosystem; and new text end new text begin (3) establish mentorship programs connecting healthcare innovators with corporate leaders and successful entrepreneurs to accelerate growth and market impact. new text end